Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 8

State Trust of Tennessee [Repealed]

9-4-801. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 53; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.

Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 4 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112, the state trust of Tennessee, created by §9-4-801, shall terminate and shall cease to exist March 31, 2017.

9-4-802. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 54; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.

9-4-803. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 55; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.

9-4-804. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 56; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.

9-4-805. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 57; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.

9-4-806. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 58; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.

9-4-807. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 59; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.

9-4-808. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 60; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.

9-4-809. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 61; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.

9-4-810. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 62; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.

9-4-811. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 63; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.

9-4-812. [Repealed.]

Acts 1989, ch. 115, § 1; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 3, effective March 31, 2017.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 8, §§9-4-801 —9-4-812 concerned the state trust of Tennessee.